Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1026
Esthetics, defined.

Esthetics means the practice for compensation of using an electrical or mechanical apparatus or appliance or applying and using cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, chemicals, tonics, lotions, creams, or other similar products upon the skin for personal beauty care.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-366;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-357.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 288.